Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Tennessee Housing Development Agency Act

13-23-101. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Housing Development Agency Act.”

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2301.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 901, § 2 provided that it was the legislative intent of that act to transfer, in full, the obligations, rights, duties, and funds of the Tennessee housing rehabilitation corporation to the Tennessee housing development agency.

Attorney General Opinions. Preference in THDA's qualified allocation plan for developments in qualified census tracts. OAG 11-65, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (9/13/11).

13-23-102. Fund raising — Powers — Purposes.

In order to promote the production of more affordable new housing units for very low, low and moderate income individuals and families in the state, to promote the preservation and rehabilitation of existing housing units for such persons, and to bring greater stability to the residential construction industry and related industries so as to assure a steady flow of production of new housing units, the Tennessee housing development agency is given the power to raise funds from private investors through issuance of its bonds and notes and to use such funds, together with investment income, and moneys from other public and private sources to:

Make funds available to sponsors, developers and builders for financing land development and residential housing construction for lower and moderate income persons and families;

Make funds available to sponsors, developers, builders and purchasers for permanent mortgage financing of housing for lower and moderate income persons and families;

Purchase existing insured mortgages from lenders within the state and direct an amount equal to the proceeds from the liquidated mortgage investments into new mortgages on residential real property;

Enter into advance commitments with lenders to purchase insured mortgage loans made to persons and families of lower and moderate income; and further, provide technical, consultative and project assistance services to sponsors of land development or residential housing; and assist in coordinating federal, state, regional and local public and private efforts and resources to otherwise increase the supply of such residential housing;

Make funds available for housing loans for veterans who qualify as persons and families of low and moderate income by including in each issue of bonds sold under this chapter a veterans' administration guaranteed loan program; and

Make grants to eligible political subdivisions, as defined by § 13-23-103, and to such private nonprofit corporations that provide housing and related services in the state; however, such grants must be for purposes which are consistent with the purposes and mission of the agency, and must be allocated and administered in a fashion and manner as is directed by the agency through appropriate rules, regulations and proceedings.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2302; Acts 1984, ch. 799, § 4; 1988, ch. 900, § 1.

13-23-103. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Agency” means the Tennessee housing development agency created by this part;

“Average Tennessee household” means the Tennessee household of average size and median gross annual household income based on the most recent federal census or the American community survey five-year estimates released in the year following the most recent federal census;

“Bonds” or “notes” means the bonds and notes respectively authorized to be issued by the agency under this chapter;

“Eligible political subdivision” means a county, metropolitan government, municipality receiving community development block grant funds directly from the United States department of housing and urban development, a municipality in a county not otherwise applying, or a consortium of such eligible political subdivisions;

“Energy-saving improvement” means an improvement to a residential housing unit through the installation of insulation, heating or cooling systems conservative of energy, or other fixtures to the structure capable of reducing its total energy needs;

“Governmental agency” means any department, division, public agency, political subdivision or other public instrumentality of the state, the federal government, and other state or public agency, or any two (2) or more thereof;

“Housing cost index” means an index of specific housing cost factors to the average Tennessee household calculated monthly or at such times as the agency may require, based on the following formula:

The median gross monthly household income divided into the sum of:

The monthly mortgage payment for the average Tennessee household based on a thirty-year mortgage, at the prevailing mortgage interest rate on a mortgage amount sufficient to purchase a standard housing structure that will meet minimum property standards as established by the federal housing administration, including an amount representative of the average yield in discount points and servicing fees to the lender on such mortgage, based on the average discount paid at the latest Federal National Mortgage Association mortgage auction sale;

A monthly cost factor for mortgage insurance based on the mortgage insurance premium that would be required on the mortgage at the prevailing interest rate; and

An average monthly cost factor for taxes and fire insurance incurred by the average Tennessee household on a standard housing structure as required by federal housing administration minimum property standards based on data compiled by the federal housing administration;

“Insured construction loan” means a construction loan for land development or residential housing which is secured by a federally insured mortgage or which is insured or guaranteed by the United States or an instrumentality thereof, or for which there is a commitment by the United States or instrumentality thereof to insure or guarantee such a loan, or a construction loan which is secured by a policy of insurance or guarantee issued by any private mortgage insurer qualified to issue such insurance or guarantee in Tennessee and approved by the agency, or for which there is a commitment to insure or guarantee such loans made by any private mortgage insurer qualified to do business in Tennessee and approved by the agency, or a construction loan insured or guaranteed by an agency or instrumentality of the state authorized by law to issue such insurance or guarantee, or for which there is a commitment to insure or guarantee such loan made by such agency or instrumentality of the state;

“Insured mortgage” or “insured mortgage loan” means a mortgage loan for residential housing insured or guaranteed by the United States or any instrumentality thereof, or for which there is a commitment by the United States or instrumentality thereof to insure or guarantee such a mortgage, or a mortgage loan which is secured by a policy of insurance or guarantee issued by any private mortgage insurer qualified to issue such insurance or guarantee in Tennessee and approved by the agency, or for which there is a commitment to insure or guarantee such loan made by any private mortgage insurer qualified to do business in Tennessee and approved by the agency, or a mortgage loan insured or guaranteed by any agency or instrumentality of the state authorized by law to issue such insurance, or for which there is a commitment to insure or guarantee such loan made by such agency or instrumentality of the state;

“Insured mortgage” or “insured mortgage loan” also means a loan made on a qualified residential property in which the borrower owns, or is prepared to own by use of a cash down payment, at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the equity in the property based on its appraisal value or the sale price, whichever is the lesser amount;

“Land development” means the process of acquiring land primarily for residential housing construction for persons and families of lower and moderate income and making, installing or constructing nonresidential housing improvements, including water, sewer and other utilities, roads, streets, curbs, gutters, sidewalks, storm drainage facilities and other installations or works, whether on or off the site, which the agency deems necessary or desirable to prepare such land primarily for residential housing construction within this state;

“Lender” or “qualified lender” means any bank or trust company, federally approved mortgagee, insurance company, mortgage banking institution, federally insured savings and loan association or insured state building and loan association, which is located and authorized to do business in the state, and which is approved by the agency, or the federal national mortgage association;

“Low income household” means an individual or family unit whose income does not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the area or state median income, whichever is greater, adjusted for family size;

“Mortgage” includes deeds of trust, mortgages, building and loan contracts or other instruments conveying real or personal property as security for bonds and conferring a right to foreclose and cause a sale thereof;

“Obligations” means any bonds or notes authorized to be issued by the agency under this part;

“Persons and families of lower and moderate income” means persons and families irrespective of race, creed, national origin, age or sex deemed by the agency to require such assistance as is made available by this chapter on account of insufficient personal or family income based upon the income limits established by the board of directors. In establishing these income limits, the board of directors shall be required to take into consideration, without limitation, such factors that will ensure for the citizens of the state the equal opportunity to live in equal quality housing relative to their needs, including the following:

The amount of the total income of such persons and families available for housing needs;

The size of the family;

The cost and condition of housing facilities available, including consideration of the following:

Cost of a typical dwelling lot;

Cost of materials;

Cost of labor;

Cost of real estate taxes; and

Cost of home owners' or renters' insurance;

The eligibility of such persons and families for federal housing assistance of any type predicated upon a lower income basis; and

The ability of such persons and families to compete successfully in the normal housing market and to pay the amounts at which private enterprise is providing decent, safe and sanitary housing, and deemed by the agency to be eligible to occupy residential housing constructed and financed, wholly or in part, with insured construction loans or insured mortgages, or with other public or private assistance;

“Qualified sponsors, developers, builders or purchasers” means any person, corporation, profit or nonprofit, public or private, licensed general contractor or any other person or entity deemed by the board of directors to be qualified in providing housing for low and moderate income families; however, the Tennessee housing development agency shall not be deemed to be included in the definition herein;

“Qualifying not-for-profit corporation” means a not-for-profit organization that qualifies as such under the Internal Revenue Code § 501 (c)(3) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), and chartered by the state or a nonprofit affiliate of such organization. Such qualifying organization must have substantial experience in providing low and moderate income households with housing. Specific experience and other qualifying criteria shall be set by the agency through rule and regulation;

“Residential housing” means a specific work or improvement within this state undertaken primarily to provide dwelling accommodations for persons and families of lower and moderate income, including the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation of land, buildings and improvements thereto and such other nonhousing facilities as may be incidental or appurtenant thereto;

“Servicing fees” means that sum paid for the reasonable value of services rendered to the agency for the servicing of mortgages it acquires;

“Servicing of mortgages” means the collection and payment of all principal and interest and all reasonable fees and charges by the lender for mortgages acquired by the agency;

“Solar hot water heater” means an appliance or system capable of producing most or all of the hot water needs of an average Tennessee household through the use of natural sunlight;

“State” means the state of Tennessee; and

“Very low income household” means an individual or family unit whose income does not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the area or state median income, whichever is greater, adjusted for family size.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 3; 1974, ch. 702, § 1; 1978, ch. 884, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2303; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 12; 1991, ch. 466, § 2; 2010, ch. 961, § 2.

Cross-References. Housing cost index and when program becomes operative, § 13-23-114.

13-23-104. Creation.

There is hereby created a body, politic and corporate, to be known as the “Tennessee housing development agency.” The agency, a political subdivision and instrumentality of the state, shall be deemed to be acting in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state in the performance of essential public functions and shall be deemed to be serving a public purpose and improving and otherwise promoting the health, welfare, and prosperity of the people of the state, and that the Tennessee housing development agency shall be empowered to act on behalf of the state and its people in serving this public purpose for the benefit of the general public.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1974, ch. 702, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2304.

Compiler's Notes. The housing development agency, board of directors, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Attorney General Opinions. Administration of project-based section 8 housing assistance payments contracts. OAG 12-25, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 25 (2/29/12).

13-23-105. Board of directors.

The agency shall have a board of directors which shall be responsible for carrying out the powers given to the agency by this part.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1979, ch. 442, § 8; T.C.A., § 13-2305.

13-23-106. State officer members — Delegation of duties.

The state treasurer, the comptroller of the treasury, the commissioner of finance and administration, the secretary of state, and a staff assistant to the governor to be designated in writing by the governor, and their successors in the office, from time to time shall, by virtue of their incumbency in such offices and without further appointment or qualification, be directors of the agency.

Such directors may designate a member of their respective staffs to attend meetings of the board of directors or its committees and to exercise their right to vote in their absence. Such designations must be made in writing to the chair of the board of directors and filed with the secretary of state.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1975, ch. 320, § 1; 1977, ch. 483, § 1; 1979, ch. 442, § 1; T.C.A., § 13-2306.

13-23-107. Appointed members — Qualifications.

The governor shall appoint the following members to the board of directors for the agency, who shall be citizens of the state and shall not hold public office: a total of six (6) persons representing the following groups, with no more than one (1) person representing each group: retail building material supply; manufactured housing; home building; mortgage banking; licensed real estate brokers; local public housing authority; local government; and a qualifying not-for-profit corporation.

After June 30, 2013, the governor shall appoint two (2) persons from the public at large who are knowledgeable about the problems about inadequate housing conditions in the state.

Upon the first term expiration for one (1) of the public at large members, that public at large position shall expire, without reappointment, at the end of the member's term. After this term expiration and thereafter, the governor shall appoint one (1) person from the public at large who is knowledgeable about the problems about inadequate housing conditions in the state.

When making appointments, the governor shall give due consideration to geographic distribution of the members of the agency to ensure that all parts of the state are adequately represented.

In making appointments to the agency board of directors, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person appointed to serve on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives shall each appoint one (1) member from the public at large who shall be citizens of the state, shall not hold public office and shall be knowledgeable about the problems of inadequate housing conditions in the state. Any change in the status or profession of an appointed member shall not affect such member's position or term as a member of the agency.

Each member of the agency duly appointed by the governor pursuant to the former provisions of this section shall continue to serve and fill such member's respective membership position until the expiration of the term of office to which such member was appointed and until such member's successor is duly appointed and qualified. At the expiration of the term of office to which a member was appointed pursuant to the former provisions of this section, such member may be reappointed subject to the limitations imposed by this section and § 13-23-108.

Other individuals may be directors of the agency as may be required by applicable federal law, regulation or agreement, who shall be eligible to vote on matters before the agency to the extent required by federal law, regulation or agreement.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1979, ch. 442, § 2; T.C.A., § 13-2307; Acts 1982, ch. 641, § 1; 1988, ch. 900, § 2; 1988, ch. 1013, § 11; 1993, ch. 21, § 1; 2013, ch. 414, §§ 1, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 414, § 5 provided that the board members whose terms expire on June 30, 2013, shall continue to serve on the board after May 16, 2013, until the expiration of their terms.

13-23-108. Appointed members — Terms, etc.

The members of the board of directors appointed pursuant to § 13-23-107 shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of the member's term, the member shall continue to serve until a successor is duly appointed and qualified. When making appointments, the governor shall consider recommendations from relevant interest groups for each vacancy. Furthermore, when making appointments, the governor and speakers shall give consideration to the ethnic, economic and social composition of the state, with particular emphasis on achieving a balance among urban and rural members from the three (3) grand divisions of the state. No appointed member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms, unless one (1) such term is an appointment to fill an unexpired term with less than two (2) years remaining, but such appointed member may continue to serve until such appointed member's successor is duly appointed and qualified.

Each appointed member may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or willful neglect of duty as determined by the governor. Any appointed member who is absent from four (4) meetings of the board of directors during any twelve-month period shall cease to be a member of the agency and the position shall become vacant upon certification of such fact to the governor by the secretary of the agency.

Before entering into the appointed member's duties, each appointed member shall take an oath of office to administer the duties of such appointed member's office faithfully and impartially, and a record of such oath shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1977, ch. 483, § 2; 1979, ch. 442, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-2308; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 3; 1992, ch. 724, § 1.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

13-23-109. Compensation of members.

The members of the agency shall receive no compensation for their services, but shall be entitled to receive, from funds of the agency, for attendance at meetings of the agency or any committee thereof and for other services for the agency, reimbursement for such actual expenses as may be incurred for travel and subsistence in the performance of official duties. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(57); 1979, ch. 442, § 7; T.C.A., § 13-2309.

13-23-110. Quorum.

A majority of the members of the agency shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative vote of eight (8) members at a meeting of the members duly called and held shall be necessary for any action taken by the membership of the agency. No vacancy in the membership of the agency shall impair the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and to perform all the duties of the agency. For the purposes of determining a quorum and the number of affirmative votes at a meeting, persons who have been delegated the right to vote in accordance with § 13-23-106 shall be considered members of the agency.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1975, ch. 320, § 5; 1977, ch. 483, § 3; T.C.A., § 13-2310; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 4; 1993, ch. 21, § 2; 2013, ch. 414, § 4.

13-23-111. Chair and vice chair.

The governor shall designate from those appointed members of the agency a member to serve as chair. The term of the chair shall extend to the earlier of either the date of expiration of such member's then current term as a member of the agency or a date six (6) months after the expiration of the then current term of the governor designating such chair. The agency shall annually elect one (1) of its members as vice chair.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2311; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 14.

13-23-112. Officers — Executive director — Secretary — Audit and budget committee.

The agency shall elect or appoint, and prescribe the duties of, such other officers as the agency deems necessary or advisable, including an executive director and a secretary.

The executive director shall be a person of good moral character and shall be professionally qualified to administer the programs and duties of the agency. Such professional qualifications must as a minimum be evidenced by a minimum of three (3) years' experience immediately preceding such professional's appointment or election in the theory and practice of residential housing construction, law, real estate, home mortgage finance, architecture, building materials supply, public administration or urban planning.

The executive director shall administer, manage and direct the affairs and business of the agency subject to the policies, control and direction of the board of directors.

The secretary of the agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the agency and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the agency, the minute book or journal of the agency and its official seal. The secretary shall have authority to cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the agency may rely upon such certificates.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The state treasurer shall be the treasurer of the agency. The treasurer shall be the custodian of the assets of the agency except for those assets required by contracts with bondholders to be in the custody of the trustee. The board of directors shall set the investment policy for agency assets and the treasurer shall be responsible for making investments in accordance with such policy. The treasurer may delegate all or a portion of these duties and responsibilities to the executive director.

The secretary of the bond finance committee shall, subject to the policies of the board of directors and bond finance committee, be responsible for the execution of all matters relating to the issuance and servicing of the bonds and notes of the agency. The secretary of the bond finance committee may delegate these duties and responsibilities to the executive director.

There is hereby created an audit and budget committee of the agency, which shall be composed of the following:

The chair of the agency;

The vice chair of the agency;

The state treasurer;

The secretary of state; and

Two (2) members appointed annually by the chair from among the appointed members of the board.

The state treasurer shall serve as the chair of the audit and budget committee in even years and the secretary of state shall serve as the chair of the audit and budget committee in odd years beginning in 2013, and alternating thereafter.

The agency's director of internal audit shall serve as the secretary for the committee. The agency's director of internal audit shall serve at the pleasure of the committee. The committee has the authority to employ, terminate and establish the salary of the director of internal audit.

Three (3) or more members of the audit and budget committee shall constitute a quorum and the concurring vote of three (3) members shall be required for the approval of matters coming before the committee. Written minutes of all meetings shall be prepared by the secretary and kept on file, open to public inspection. The audit and budget committee shall be charged with the responsibility of monitoring agency financial and programmatic controls, including potential conflicts of interest of agency members and staff. To carry out these responsibilities, the committee shall review reports from the agency internal audit staff and shall review agency financial and programmatic controls at least annually, and shall review and submit the annual agency budget to the bond finance committee and the board.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(57); T.C.A., § 13-2312; Acts 1988, ch. 900, § 5; 1992, ch. 724, § 2; 2011, ch. 16, § 1; 2013, ch. 414, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 414, § 5 provided that the board members whose terms expire on June 30, 2013, shall continue to serve on the board after May 16, 2013, until the expiration of their terms.

13-23-113. Distribution of benefits restricted.

No part of the revenues or assets of the agency shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to its members or officers or other private persons.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2313.

13-23-114. Housing cost index — Program becoming operative.

The agency shall establish a housing cost index as defined in § 13-23-103 to be computed monthly or at such time or times as the agency in its discretion may require. The housing cost index shall serve to determine what percentage of the average Tennessee household's gross monthly income is required to pay for primary fixed housing costs under then existing housing market conditions and to establish a basis for a threshold at which the financial assistance programs of this chapter will become effective. Thus, it is hereby found and declared that when primary housing costs, as defined by the housing cost index, reach or exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of an average Tennessee household's gross monthly income, a majority of Tennessee citizens are excluded from the normal housing market; and, in light of that finding, when the housing cost index reaches or exceeds a factor of twenty-five percent (25%) and upon the approval of the board of directors, the financial assistance programs established in this chapter will become operative to aid in providing adequate housing for lower and moderate income persons and families as defined by § 13-23-103. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the agency may at any time approve the operation of the financial assistance programs of this chapter with the affirmative vote of nine (9) members of its board of directors.

Acts 1973, ch. 241, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-2314.